West Virginia, session 2025, HB2282.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. Authorization for Department of Transportation to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 8 - 1. Parkways Authority. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 31, 2024, authorized under the authority of §17-16D-14 of this code, modified by the Parkways Authority to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 11, 2024, relating to the Parkways Authority (supporting electronic toll collection and enforcement, 184 CSR 05), is authorized.